hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta jarbola: Oboje; RDM; SDM; Ostalo
vi: Loại cột buồm tương thích: Cả hai; RDM; SDM; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní typ stožáru: Obojí; RDM; SDM; Jiné
ja: 対応マストタイプ: 両方; RDM; SDM; その他
ro-RO: Tip de catarg compatibil: Ambele; RDM; SDM; Altele
fr: Type de mât compatible: Les deux; RDM; SDM; Autre
zh-CN: 适用桅杆类型: 两者; RDM; SDM; 其他
th: ประเภทเสากระโดงที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ทั้งคู่; RDM; SDM; อื่นๆ
pl: Zgodny typ masztu: Oba; RDM; SDM; Inne
zh-TW: 相容桅杆類型: 兩者皆可; RDM; SDM; 其他
da: Kompatibel mastetype: Begge; RDM; SDM; Andet
nl: Compatibel masttype: Beide; RDM; SDM; Overig
de: Kompatibler Masttyp: Beide; RDM; SDM; Sonstige
es: Tipo de mástil compatible: Ambos; RDM; SDM; Otro
fi: Yhteensopiva mastotyyppi: Molemmat; RDM; SDM; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de mastro compatível: Ambos; RDM; SDM; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo stiebas: Abu; RDM; SDM; Kita
en: Compatible mast type: Both; RDM; SDM; Other
it: Tipo di albero compatibile: Entrambi; RDM; SDM; Altro
tr: Uyumlu direk tipi: Her ikisi; RDM; SDM; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta jamborja: Oboje; RDM; SDM; Drugo
ru: Совместимый тип мачты: Оба; RDM; SDM; Другое
bg-BG: Съвместим тип мачта: Двете; RDM; SDM; Друго
sv: Kompatibel masttyp: Båda; RDM; SDM; Övrigt
el: Συμβατός τύπος ιστού: Και τα δύο; RDM; SDM; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis árbóctípus: Mindkettő; RDM; SDM; Egyéb
ko: 호환 마스트 유형: 모두; RDM; SDM; 기타
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ stožiaru: Oboje; RDM; SDM; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de mastro compatível: Ambos; RDM; SDM; Outro
nb: Kompatibel masttype: Begge; RDM; SDM; Annet